Massachusetts, session 194th, H3444.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 57 of Chapter 147 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following sentence:-
Any bid or proposal for the installation, repair, or maintenance of security systems that is
submitted by a person, firm or corporation not in compliance with this section at the time the bid
or proposal is submitted shall be deemed invalid.
of 1